North Carolina, session 2025, SB340.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Pittsboro to enhance its
emergency fire services. These funds shall be used as follows:
(1) Seven million dollars ($7,000,000) for the construction of a new fire station.
(2) One million eight hundred thousand dollars ($1,800,000) for a new ladder
truck.
(3) One million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,0000) for a new fire
engine.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S340-v-1*